Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2112
Special electrician license; licensee; rights and privileges; qualifications.

The board shall by rule or regulation provide for the issuance of special electrician licenses empowering the licensee to engage in a limited class or classes of electrical work, which class or classes shall be specified on the license. Each licensee shall have experience, acceptable to the board, in each such limited class of work for which such licensee is licensed.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-583;

Laws 2024, LB144, § 5.